California, session 20252026, SB1012.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2716.5 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2716.5. (a) There is hereby established the Prerelease Construction Trades Certificate Program, hereinafter referred to in this section as “the program,” in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, hereinafter referred to in this section as the “department,” to increase employment opportunities in the construction trades for inmates upon release.(b) The department shall establish a joint advisory committee to implement the program. The committee shall be composed of representatives from building and construction trades employee organizations, the State Building and Construction Trades Council of California, joint apprenticeship training programs, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, and any other representatives the department determines appropriate. The responsibilities of the committee shall include, but are not be limited to, the following:(1) Develop guidelines for the participation of inmates in preapprenticeship training programs, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 14230 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. The guidelines shall provide for the integration, for all inmate preapprenticeship training programs in the building and construction trades, of the multicraft core curriculum implemented by the State Department of Education for its California Partnership Academies pilot project and by the California Workforce Development Board and local boards.(2) Develop and implement a prerelease construction trades certification that validates that an inmate completed instruction, skills, and competencies required by and recognized by the participating building and construction trades.(3) Ensure compliance with any applicable requirements and regulations of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.(4) Evaluate prerelease on-the-job training opportunities to compare and match competencies with those of registered apprentices in the building and construction trades.(5) Explore the feasibility of the electronic tracking of each participating inmate’s relevant activities to efficiently capture competencies related to the certification.(6) Explore the prerelease awarding of formal credit for apprenticeship hours recognized by joint apprenticeship training programs and the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.(7) Facilitate the admission of graduates of inmate preapprenticeship programs and graduates of the California Conservation Camp program, after release, into state-approved apprenticeship programs and for apprenticeship programs to evaluate such individuals for admission with advanced standing based on prior coursework and work experience.(c) For purposes of this article, “graduates of the California Conservation program” means graduates who have participated in California Conservation Camp programs as an incarcerated individual hand crewmember.SEC. 2. Section 2716.6 is added to the Penal Code, to read:2716.6. (a) The joint advisory committee described in Section 2716.5, in consultation with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Industrial Relations, and the California Conservation Camp program, shall facilitate the admission of graduates of the program, after release, into any relevant state-approved apprenticeship and for state-approved apprenticeship programs in the building and construction trades, including those in general construction, to evaluate such individuals for admission with advanced standing based on prior coursework and work experience.(b) Successful completion of conservation camp programs, including, but not limited to, wildland firefighter training, such as environmental remediation and forestry management, emergency response, and hazardous waste cleanup, shall constitute qualifying experience for a state-approved apprenticeship in the building and construction trades under the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.(c) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, in partnership with the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and the California Conservation Camp program, ensure that all individuals who complete the program receive a certification acknowledging their fire camp training and work experience to ensure eligibility for state-approved apprenticeship programs in the building and construction trades.(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude state-approved apprenticeship programs outside of the building and construction trades under the Division of Apprenticeship Standards from evaluating graduates of the California Conservation Camp program for admission with advanced standing based on prior coursework and work experience.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________